Hawaii, session 2025, SB866.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that investment in public health infrastructure is critical to reduce the probability of death and disability in local communities by increasing timely response and ability to render effective aid to 911 calls - both of which are of paramount importance to successful outcomes from life-threatening incidents and sickness. The legislature further finds that ensuring access to emergency health care statewide is contingent on empowering aspiring medical health care professionals, including emergency medical services personnel, to practice in the State. Currently, under section 453-32, Hawaii Revised Statutes, emergency medical technicians, advanced emergency medical technicians, mobile intensive care technicians, and paramedics can pursue licensure from the Hawaiʻi medical board after completing various prerequisites, including position-specific local programs and certification by the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians for the requisite level of practice. The legislature also finds that in recent years, efforts to request funding for the establishment of advanced life support ambulances have stalled due to a lack of qualified personnel to consistently staff the vehicles. Existing law requires a minimum of one mobile intensive care technician and one emergency medical technician for advanced life support, as well as two emergency medical technicians for basic life support, except hospital-based ambulance service, which requires one emergency medical technician and one registered nurse licensed in the State. The legislature further finds that there are only three institutions that currently provide programs that offer the requisite training for emergency medical service licensure in the State, including Kapiolani community college; university of Hawaiʻi, Maui college campus; and Hawaiʻi community college.  With programs not offered in every county, many prospective emergency services personnel are required to relocate to pursue licensure.  This barrier has created a disparate impact on rural, underserved communities in these counties, where public health services represent a significant source of health care. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the department of health to establish and implement a program to improve access to critical care by increasing support for emergency medical services personnel in the State. SECTION 2. (a)  The department of health shall establish and implement a program to improve and increase support for emergency medical services by: (1)  Expanding access to curriculum and training approved by the department of health for emergency medical services personnel in each county of the State, including remote or virtual classes; (2)  Providing a pathway for high school students who want to pursue a career in emergency medical services; (3)  Promoting the recruitment, hiring, and retention of trained emergency medical services personnel in each county of the State; (4)  Providing reimbursement for fees and costs associated with training courses required for licensure to individuals who successfully obtain a license pursuant to section 453-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes; and (5)  Providing new equipment, medication, and vehicles to the county emergency medical services systems established pursuant to section 46-192, Hawaii Revised Statutes. (b) The department of health shall submit a report of its findings and recommendations regarding the effectiveness of the program, including any proposed legislation, to the legislature no later than twenty days prior to the convening of the regular sessions of 2026 and 2027. (c)  The program shall cease to exist on June 30, 2027. SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the department of health to establish a program to improve and increase support for emergency medical services in the State pursuant to section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of health for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________